California statutes. Water Code
For property within a district, a portion thereof, or an improvement district, which property was previously charged or assessed for such purposes, the district by resolution may fix on or before the third Monday of August, in each fiscal year, a water standby assessment or availability charge in the district, in any portion thereof, or in any improvement district, to which water is made available by the district, whether the water is actually used or not.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 139.)
-------------------------------------------

71638.2.

The resolution fixing a standby assessment or availability charge may establish schedules varying the charges according to land uses, water uses, and degree of water availability, subject to the maximum charges provided in Section 71631.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 139.)
-------------------------------------------

71638.4.

The levy and collection of such assessment or charge shall be made as provided in Sections 71634 through 71637, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 139.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.7. Standby Assessments [71639. - 71639.]

71639.

(a) This article applies to the Three Valleys Municipal Water District.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the district, by resolution, may adopt an assessment with a schedule of annual adjustments, and adjust the amount of an assessment in accordance with this section, if the adjustment is made in the same manner as provided for taxes, fees, and charges in subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 53750 of the Government Code.

(c) The district shall cause notice of the intent to adopt the resolution to be published pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code prior to the date set for the adoption of the assessment, and shall hear any and all objections at the time and place set forth in the notice. The district, at the time and place specified in the notice, shall conduct the hearing and consider all objections to the assessment. Thereafter, the district may adjust the assessment, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The amount of the assessment does not exceed twenty-nine dollars and forty-one cents ($29.41) per equivalent dwelling unit.

(2) The revenue raised by the assessment, including its annual adjustments, is used exclusively to fund the readiness-to-serve charge, or equivalent charge, imposed upon the district by the Metropolitan Water District of Southern California, and related administrative costs.

(3) The district adjusts its water rates to its retail agencies by an amount necessary to prevent surplus funding of the readiness-to-serve charge imposed upon the district by the Metropolitan Water District of Southern California.

(d) For the purposes of Article XIIIC and Article XIIID of the California Constitution, the district has not increased an assessment if the district adjusts an assessment in the same manner as provided for taxes, fees, and charges in subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 53750 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 210, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Water Shortages [71640. - 71644.]

71640.

A district may restrict the use of district water during any emergency caused by drought, or other threatened or existing water shortage, and may prohibit the wastage of district water or the use of district water during such periods for any purpose other than household uses or such other restricted uses as the district determines to be necessary. A district may also prohibit use of district water during such periods for specific uses which it finds to be nonessential.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71641.

A district may prescribe and define by ordinance the restrictions, prohibitions, and exclusions referred to in Section 71640. Such an ordinance is effective upon adoption; but, within 10 days after its adoption, the ordinance shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in full in a newspaper of general circulation which is printed, published, and circulated in the district. If there is no such newspaper the ordinance shall be posted within 10 days after its adoption in three public places within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71642.

A finding by the board upon the existence, threat, or duration of an emergency or shortage, or upon the matter of necessity or of any other matter or condition referred to in Section 71640, shall be made by resolution or ordinance. The finding is prima facie evidence of the fact or matter so found, and such fact or matter shall be presumed to continue unchanged unless and until a contrary finding is made by the board by resolution or ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71643.

The finding made by the board pursuant to Section 71642 shall be received in evidence in any civil or criminal proceeding in which it may be offered, and shall be proof and evidence of the fact or matter found until rebutted or overcome by other sufficient evidence received in such proceeding. A copy of any resolution or ordinance setting forth such finding shall, when certified by the secretary of the district, be evidence that the finding was made by the district as shown by the resolution or ordinance and certification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71644.

From and after the publication or posting of any ordinance pursuant to Section 71641, and until the ordinance has been repealed or the emergency or threatened emergency has ceased, it is a misdemeanor for any person to use or apply water received from the district contrary to or in violation of any restriction or prohibition specified in the ordinance. Upon conviction thereof such person shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 30 days, or by fine not exceeding six hundred dollars ($600), or by both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 417.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Other Functions [71660. - 71689.27.]



  ARTICLE 1. Recreation and Electrical Power [71660. - 71664.]

71660.

A district may construct, maintain, improve, and operate public recreational facilities appurtenant to facilities operated or contracted to be operated by the district. It may by ordinance provide regulations binding upon all persons to govern the use of such facilities, including regulations imposing reasonable charges for the use thereof. Violation of district regulations relating to vehicle or boat speed limits, defacement of district property, the use, possession or discharge of firearms, weapons or fireworks, the creation of fire hazards, being under the influence of intoxicating beverages or dangerous drugs, or remaining on, or reentering district premises after an authorized district officer or employee has specifically withdrawn consent for a person to utilize district facilities, is a misdemeanor. Violation of any other regulation of the district adopted pursuant to this section is an infraction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 127.)
-------------------------------------------

71661.

In addition to the activities authorized by Section 71660, the Big Bear Municipal Water District may construct, maintain, improve, and operate public recreational facilities which are not appurtenant to a water reservoir operated by the district, when such proposal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters of the district voting at a special district election held pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 71450) of Division 20.

This section, applicable only to the Big Bear Municipal Water District, is necessary because of the unique and special recreational problems of the area within such district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 479.)
-------------------------------------------

71662.

A district may utilize any part of its water, and any part of its works, facilities, improvements, and property used for the development, storage, and transportation of water pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 71610) to provide, generate, and deliver hydroelectric power, and may acquire, construct, operate, and maintain any and all works, facilities, improvements, and property necessary or convenient for such utilization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 146.)
-------------------------------------------

71663.

A district may (a) pursuant to contract, provide, sell, and deliver hydroelectric power to the United States of America or any board, department or agency thereof, to the State of California for the purposes of the State Water Resources Development System, and to any public agency, private corporation, or other person or entity, or any combination thereof, engaged in the sale of electric power at retail; or (b) use all or any part of such hydroelectric power directly, or indirectly through exchange, in exercising any of the powers described in Section 71590 or as otherwise provided by law.

For the purposes of this section, “public agency” means a city, county, city and county, district, local agency, public authority, or public corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 146.)
-------------------------------------------

71663.5.

(a) A district may provide, generate, and deliver electric power, and may construct, operate, and maintain any and all works, facilities, improvements, and property, or portion thereof, necessary or convenient for that generation and delivery.

(b) The electric powerplant or plants and transmission lines constructed pursuant to this section may be leased for operation. The power generated shall be used by a district for its own purposes. A district may sell surplus power to a public or private entity that is engaged in the distribution or sale of electricity. For purposes of this section, “for its own purposes” means a district performing only functions in its capacity as a water district, including, but not be limited to, any of the following:

(1) Pumping operations.

(2) Water treatment operations.

(3) Barrier intrusion operations.

(4) Desalination operations.

(c) Nothing in this section grants to a district the authority to provide, sell, or deliver electric power at retail.

(d) A district may not acquire property employed in the generation or delivery of electric power for public or private utility purposes, except by mutual agreement between the district and the owner of that property.

(e) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature, that each district that has purchased electricity from an electrical corporation on or after February 1, 2001, regardless of whether the district thereafter generates its own electricity, bear a pro rata share of the Department of Water Resources’ electricity purchase costs, that are recoverable from electrical corporation customers in commission-approved rates. It is the further intent of the Legislature to prevent any shifting of recoverable costs from districts that generate their own electricity pursuant to this section, to electrical corporation bundled customers.

(2) To the extent that any shifting of recoverable costs would occur, in the determination of the commission, those costs shall be recovered from districts that generate their own electricity, pursuant to this section.

(3) The Legislature finds and declares that the revisions of this subdivision are consistent with the requirements of Chapter 4 of the Statutes of 2001, First Extraordinary Session, and do not constitute a change in, but are declaratory of existing law.

(f) A district that generates its own electricity pursuant to this section shall be responsible for paying the following:

(1) A charge equivalent to the charges that would otherwise be imposed on the district by the commission to recover bond related costs pursuant to any agreement between the commission and the Department of Water Resources pursuant to Section 80110 of the Water Code, which charges shall be payable until all obligations of the Department of Water Resources pursuant to Division 27 (commencing with Section 80000) of the Water Code are fully paid or otherwise discharged. All bond charges are the property of the Department of Water Resources.

(2) If a district generates new offsite power, it shall be responsible for the additional costs of the Department of Water Resources, equal to the share of the Department of Water Resources’ estimated net unavoidable electricity purchase contract costs attributable to the district as determined by the commission, for the period commencing with the district’s initial generation of its offsite electricity, through the expiration of all then existing electricity purchase contracts entered into by the Department of Water Resources.

(g) A district generating its own electricity pursuant to this section shall reimburse the electrical corporation that previously served the district for all of the following:

(1) The electrical corporation’s unrecovered past undercollections for electricity purchases, including any financing costs, attributable to that district, that the commission lawfully determines may be recovered in rates.

(2) Any additional costs of the electrical corporation recoverable in commission approved rates, equal to the share of the electrical corporation’s estimated net unavoidable electricity purchase contract costs attributable to the district, as determined by the commission, for the period commencing with the district’s initial generation of electricity pursuant to this section, through the expiration of all then existing electricity purchase contracts entered into by the electrical corporation.

(h) (1) Any charges imposed pursuant to subdivision (f) shall be the property of the Department of Water Resources. Any charges imposed pursuant to subdivision (g) shall be the property of the particular electrical corporation. The commission shall establish sufficient mechanisms, including agreements with, or orders with respect to, electrical corporations as are necessary to ensure that charges payable pursuant to this section shall be promptly remitted to the party entitled to the payment.

(2) Charges imposed pursuant to this section shall be nonbypassable.

(i) Prior to implementing this section, the commission shall submit a report certifying its satisfaction of the provisions of this section to the Senate Energy, Utilities and Communications Committee, or its successor, and the Assembly Committee on Utilities and Commerce, or its successor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 848, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

71664.

The Marin Municipal Water District may construct, maintain, and operate one or more plants for the generation of power from wind or solar radiation, and the transmission lines for the conveyance thereof, and in connection therewith shall have all the powers set forth in Sections 71662 and 71663 for the generation and transmission of hydroelectric power.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Sewage, Waste, and Storm Water Disposal [71670. - 71674.]

71670.

A district may acquire, construct, and operate facilities for the collection, treatment, and disposal of sewage, waste, and storm water of the district and its inhabitants.

For purposes of this article, “waste” is as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 13050, and also includes any and all aquatic vegetation, except riparian vegetation, which threatens or adversely affects the quality of the waters within the district. “Quality of the waters” is as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 13050. “Disposal of sewage” includes the sale or resale of treated effluent for any purpose.

The district may prescribe, revise, and collect rates or other charges for the services and facilities furnished pursuant to this article.

The amendment to this section enacted at the 1977–78 Regular Session of the Legislature is declaratory of and does not constitute a change in existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 418.)
-------------------------------------------

71670.5.

A district may supply sewage and waste services to property not subject to district taxes at special rates, terms and conditions as are determined by the board for such services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1864.)
-------------------------------------------

71671.

The revenues from the rates and charges for services and facilities furnished pursuant to this article may be used for the following purposes:

(a) To pay the operating and maintenance expenses of the facilities.

(b) To provide a reasonable surplus for improvements, extensions, and enlargements.

(c) To pay the interest on any bonded debt for the facilities.

(d) To provide a sinking or other fund for the payment of the principal of such bonded debt as it becomes due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71672.

The district may provide that the rates and charges for services and facilities furnished pursuant to this article may be collected with the water rates of the district, that all rates shall be billed upon the same bill and collected as one item, and that in the event of failure to pay the whole or any part of the bill, the district may discontinue any or all service for which the bill is rendered. This section shall not be construed to prohibit the collection of rates or charges by the district in any other lawful manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71674.

A district may fix, levy and collect a sewage and waste water service standby or availability charge in the same manner and under the same terms and conditions as are provided for a water standby or availability charge in Articles 2 (commencing with Section 71630) and 2.5 (commencing with Section 71638) of Chapter 2 of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 139.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Fire Protection [71680. - 71680.]

71680.

(a) A district may exercise any of the powers, functions, and duties which are vested in, or imposed upon, a fire protection district pursuant to the Fire Protection District Law of 1987, Part 3 (commencing with Section 13800) of Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) If the district includes any part of any local agency which provides fire protection service to any territory in the district, the district shall have no authority regarding the prevention or suppression of fires, in that territory unless the district has obtained the consent of the other local agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1013, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Water Replenishment Assessment [71682. - 71689.9.]

71682.

The provisions of this article apply only to districts in which the producers of a majority of the production of ground water within the boundaries of the district are or will within one year from the enactment of this article be subject to a court judgment requiring the delivery of makeup water to downstream users.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1725.)
-------------------------------------------

71682.1.

For the purpose of replenishing the ground water supplies within such district and to provide such makeup water, a district may cause assessments to be levied as provided in this article. Provided, that:

(a) This article shall not apply to a district 80 percent of the area of which is included within the boundaries of a water replenishment district organized pursuant to Division 18 (commencing with Section 60000) of this code or 80 percent of the area of which is included within the boundaries of any other special district of any kind or type having replenishment powers and the power to levy an assessment on the ground water extractions.

(b) This article shall cease to apply to a district as of the end of any water year during which 80 percent of the area thereof becomes included within the boundries of such a water replenishment district or any such other special district denoted in subdivision (a) of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1725.)
-------------------------------------------

71683.

As used in this article:

“Include,” except when used in relation to the inclusion of land into a district, does not necessarily exclude matters not enumerated.

“Person” means any public agency or public corporation, whether federal, state, or local, or any private corporation, firm, partnership, individual, or group of individuals and includes a district levying a water replenishment assessment hereunder.

“Water year” means the period commencing on October 1st of one calendar year and ending on September 30th of the calendar year immediately following.

“Fiscal year” means the period commencing on July 1st of one calendar year and ending on June 30th of the calendar year immediately following.

“Ground water” means nonsaline water beneath the surface of the ground, whether or not flowing through known and definite channels.

“Nonsaline water” means water which has less than 1,000 parts of chlorides to 1,000,000 parts of water.

“Production” or “producing” means the extraction or extracting of ground water, by pumping or any other method, from shafts, tunnels, wells (including, but not limited to, abandoned oil wells), excavations, or other sources of such ground water, for domestic, municipal, irrigation, industrial, or other beneficial use, except that such terms shall not mean or include the extraction or extracting of ground water incidentally produced with oil in the production of oil or gas nor the extraction or extracting of ground water incidentally produced in a bona fide mining operation or in the bona fide construction of a tunnel for railroad, highway, aqueduct, pipeline, or other useful purpose (except the production of ground water for use or sale) unless the ground water so extracted shall be used or sold by the producer for domestic, municipal, irrigation, industrial, or other beneficial purpose.

“Water-producing facility” means any device or method, mechanical or otherwise, for the production of ground water from the ground water supplies within the district.

“Owner” means the person or persons owning any water-producing facility or any interest therein other than a lien to secure the payment of a debt or other obligation.

“Operator” means the person or persons operating a water-producing facility; the owner thereof shall be conclusively presumed to be such operator unless satisfactory showing be made to the board of directors of the district that such water-producing facility actually is operated by some other person or persons. “Operator” shall mean any “person” mentioned in Section 71683 who is operating a water-producing facility, it being the purpose of this article to include any such person within the provisions hereof.

“Producer” means any person or operator producing ground water within the boundaries of the district.

“Annual overdraft” means the amount, as determined by the board, by which the quantity of ground water removed by any natural or artificial means from the ground water supplies within the district during the water year exceeds the quantity of nonsaline water replaced therein by the replenishment of such ground water supplies in such water year by any natural or artificial means other than replensihment under the provisions of this article or by any other governmental agency or entity.

“Accumulated overdraft” means the aggregate amount, as determined from time to time by the board, by which the quantity of ground water removed by any natural or artificial means from the ground water supplies within the district during all preceding water years shall have exceeded the quantity of nonsaline water replaced therein by the replenishment of such ground water supplies in such water years by any natural or artificial means, the respective determination to be based upon reports, records, and other data or evidence found by the board to be adequate for the purpose of making such determination.

“Makeup water” means water of useable quality for ground water recharge required to be delivered to downstream users pursuant to a court judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1725.)
-------------------------------------------

71684.

Proceeds raised by the water replenishment assessments hereunder may only be used for the purchase of water for replenishment of the ground waters of the district and for the purchase, in whole or in part, of makeup water requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1725.)
-------------------------------------------

71685.

Not later than the second Tuesday in February each year the board shall order an engineering survey and report to be made regarding the ground water supplies of the district. The same shall include, among all other information and data which the board may require, the following:

(a) Records, data and other information for the consideration of the board in its determination of the annual overdraft.

(b) Records, data and other information for the consideration of the board in its determination of the accumulated overdraft as of the last day of the preceding water year.

(c) A report, with supporting data, as to the total production of ground water from the ground water supplies within the district during the preceding water year.

(d) A report, with supporting data, as to the changes during the preceding water year in the ground water levels and pressure levels or piezometric heights of the ground water contained within pressure-level areas of the district, and as to the effects thereof upon the ground water supplies within the district.

(e) An estimate of the annual overdraft for the current water year and for the ensuing water year.

(f) An estimate of the accumulated overdraft as of the last day of the current water year.

(g) An estimate of the total production of ground water from the ground water supplies within the district for the current water year and for the ensuing water year.

(h) An estimate of the changes during the current water year in the ground water levels, pressure levels or piezometric heights of the ground water contained within pressure-level areas of the district, and of the effects thereof upon the ground water supplies and makeup water requirements of the district.

(i) An estimate of the quantity, source, and cost of water available for replenishment of the ground water supplies and meeting the makeup water requirements of the district during the ensuing water year under the provisions of Section 71687.

(j) Records, data, estimates and other information for the consideration of the board in its determination of the makeup water requirements for the preceding, current and ensuing water years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1725.)
-------------------------------------------

71686.

On or before the second Tuesday in March of each year, and provided the survey and report called for by Section 71685 has been made, the board, by resolution, shall declare whether funds shall be raised to purchase water for replenishment and makeup water for the next ensuing water year pursuant to this article and whether the replenishment assessment will benefit, directly or indirectly, all of the persons or real property and improvements within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1725.)
-------------------------------------------

71686.1.

If the board, by resolution, determines that the funds needed to purchase replenishment or makeup water shall be raised by the levy of a replenishment assessment, then the board shall immediately publish a notice that a public hearing will be held on the second Tuesday of April for the purpose of determining whether and to what extent the estimated cost of purchasing water for replenishment and makeup requirements for the ensuing water year shall be paid for by a replenishment assessment. Such notice shall contain a copy of the board’s resolution, the time and place of the hearing, and an invitation to all interested parties to attend and be heard in support of or opposition to the proposed assessment, the engineering survey and report, and the board’s determination, and shall invite inspection of the engineering survey and report upon which the board acted. The notice shall be published in each affected county pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code, at least 10 days before the hearing date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1725.)
-------------------------------------------

71686.2.

The hearing shall be held before the board and a quorum shall be present. The hearing may be adjourned from time to time by the president or presiding officer or hearing officer but shall be completed by the first Tuesday in May next following.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1725.)
-------------------------------------------

71686.3.

The board may appoint a qualified registered engineer familiar with water problems as a hearing officer to conduct the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1725.)
-------------------------------------------

71686.4.

All evidence relevant to the engineering survey and report and the board’s determination that such a replenishment assessment shall be levied may be introduced.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1725.)
-------------------------------------------

71687.

Upon completing the hearing, but no later than the second Tuesday in May, the board shall, by resolution, find:

(a) The annual overdraft for the preceding water year.

(b) The estimated annual overdraft for the current water year.

(c) The estimated annual overdraft for the ensuing water year.

(d) The accumulated overdraft as of the last day of the preceding water year. 

(e) The estimated accumulated overdraft as of the last day of the current water year.

(f) The total production of ground water from the ground water supplies within the district during the preceding water year.

(g) The estimated total production of ground water from the ground water supplies within the district for the current water year.

(h) The estimated total production of ground water from the ground water supplies within the district for the ensuing water year.

(i) The changes during the preceding water year in the ground water levels, pressure levels or piezometric heights of the ground water contained within pressure-level areas of the district, and the effects thereof upon the ground water supplies and makeup water requirements of the district.

(j) The estimated changes during the current water year in the ground water levels, pressure levels or piezometric heights of the ground water contained within pressure-level areas of the district, and the estimated effects thereof upon the ground water supplies within the district.

(k) The quantity of water which should be purchased for the replenishment of the ground water supplies and makeup water requirements of the district during the ensuing water year.

(l) The source and estimated cost of water available for such replenishment and makeup water requirements.

(m) The estimated costs of replenishing such ground water supplies and meeting makeup water requirements of the district with such water so purchased.

(n) The estimated costs of purchasing, in water years succeeding the ensuing water year, that portion of the quantity of water which should be purchased for the replenishment of the ground water supplies and meeting the makeup water requirements of the district during the ensuing water year, but which is estimated to be unavailable for purchase during said ensuing water year; the estimated costs shall be based on the estimated price of water for replenishment and makeup purposes during the ensuing water year.

(o) The estimated rate of the replenishment assessment required to be levied upon the production of ground water from the ground water supplies within the district during the ensuing fiscal year for the purposes of accomplishing such replenishment makeup water requirements and providing a reserve fund to purchase in future years, when available, that portion of the quantity of water which should be purchased for the replenishment of the ground water supplies and meeting the makeup water requirements of the district during the ensuing water year, but which is estimated to be unavailable for purchase during such ensuing water year. 

(p) That persons extracting in the aggregate in excess of 50 percent of the water which would be subject to the water replenishment assessment, based upon production during the preceding fiscal year, have not filed their written objections to a proposed water replenishment assessment for the next succeeding fiscal year.

Without the specific finding required by this subdivision (p), no further steps shall be taken to establish such water replenishment assessment for the next succeeding fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1725.)
-------------------------------------------

71687.1.

Based on such findings the board shall, by resolution, determine what portion, if any, of the estimated cost of purchasing water for replenishment and makeup for the ensuing fiscal year shall be paid for by a replenishment assessment, and what portion, not exceeding 25 percent of the said portion, of the estimated cost of purchasing in the future that quantity of water which should be purchased during the ensuing water year, but which is estimated to be unavailable during that year, should be raised by a replenishment assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1725.)
-------------------------------------------

71687.2.

If the board determines that a replenishment assessment should be levied upon the production of ground water from ground water supplies within the district during the ensuing fiscal year, then immediately following the making of such determination the board shall levy a replenishment assessment on the production of ground water from the ground water supplies within the district during the fiscal year commencing on July 1st next, and such replenishment assessment shall be fixed by the board at a uniform rate per acre-foot of ground water so produced. The producers of such ground water shall pay such replenishment assessment to the district at the times and in the manner hereinafter in this article provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1725.)
-------------------------------------------

71688.

The district, after the levying of the replenishment assessment, shall give notice thereof to the operators of all water-producing facilities in the district as disclosed by the records of such district, which notice shall state the rate of replenishment assessment for each acre-foot of ground water to be produced during the ensuing fiscal year. The notice may be sent by postal card or by other first-class mail with postage prepaid by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1725.)
-------------------------------------------

71688.1.

The operator of each water-producing facility within the district, on or before the last day of the month immediately following the respective quarterly periods ending March 31st, June 30th, September 30th, and December 31st of each year, shall file with the district a sworn statement setting forth the total production in acre-feet of ground water from such water-producing facility during the respective quarterly periods immediately preceding the filing of the respective statements, a general description or number locating such water-producing facility, and the method or basis of the computation of such ground water production. Each statement also shall contain such other information as the district may require.

If the board by its resolution determines that additional reports or statements are necessary or useful to carry out the purposes of this article and to administer the replenishment of the ground water supplies and meet the makeup water requirements of the district, then the board shall by its resolution so declare and shall give notice of the adoption of the resolution by immediately publishing the same in each affected county pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code. Effective 30 days after such publication, the operator of each water-producing facility in such district shall file with the district the report or statement required by such resolution, at such times and in such manner and form as are provided in such resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1725.)
-------------------------------------------

71688.2.

Any replenishment assessment levied pursuant to this article shall be due and payable to the district by each producer in quarterly installments on the last day for filing the statement of the production of ground water from the water-producing facility operated by such producer during the quarterly period required to be covered by such statement. The amount so due and payable shall be computed by multiplying the production in acre-feet of ground water so produced from such water-producing facility, as reported in such statement, by the rate of the replenishment assessment fixed and levied by the board for the fiscal year in which such production shall occur.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1725.)
-------------------------------------------

71688.3.

The board shall authorize, and the district shall make, refunds in whole or in part of replenishment assessments theretofore paid, to any producer who has erroneously overstated his production of ground water in any sworn statement for a quarterly period required under the provisions of Section 71688.1, and who has overpaid his replenishment assessment for that quarter, but only upon compliance by the producer with the procedure hereinafter set forth and within the time hereinafter provided.

Any such producer, within one year of the last day for filing of the said sworn statement for the quarterly period in question, may file a verified application with the district on a form to be furnished by the district, containing such information as the district may require, requesting a refund of that portion of any replenishment assessment claimed to have been paid by reason of that producer’s erroneous overstatement of ground water production. If incomplete information is contained in said application, or if the board desires other or further information than called for by that application, the same shall also be furnished by a verified statement within 30 days of mailing of written notice of request therefor to the producer at his address as shown by the district’s records, or the application shall be deemed abandoned. Such request by the board shall not cause any application otherwise timely filed to be considered as not filed within said one-year period. The board may authorize, and the district may pay, any refund claimed without a hearing thereon, but no application shall be denied in whole or in part without a hearing being accorded to the applicant in which he shall have the burden of proof. Any determination by the board on any matter in connection with said application shall be final and conclusive upon the producer.
